Massachusetts, session 194th, H3857.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
The language of M.G.L. ch. 4, s.7, clause 43 part (b) is hereby amended by adding after 
the words  "coast guard" the following words: "United States NOAA Corps, United States Public 
Health Service, United States Space Force"